Washington statutes.
RCW 15.30.110

Issuance of warehouse number—Use of letters "CA"—Marking containers with letters and number.

The director when issuing a license to an applicant shall include a warehouse number which shall be preceded by the letters "CA". If the applicant in applying for a license includes a request for a specific warehouse number, the director shall issue such number to the applicant if such number has not been issued to a prior applicant. The letters "CA" and the number issued as provided in this section shall be marked in a manner provided by the director on all containers in which fruits or vegetables subject to the provisions of this chapter are placed or packed.

[ 1961 c 29 s 11.]